Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 476.565 is amended to read:
476.565. (1)(a) The State Fire Marshal Mobilization Fund is established in the State  Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(b) The State Fire Marshal Mobilization Fund consists of moneys appropriated by the Legislative
Assembly for deposit in the fund,  grant funds received by the Department of the State Fire Marshal
from the Federal Emergency Management Agency, and other moneys  appropriated, allocated, de-
posited or transferred to the  fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise , including other grant
funds, reimbursements and moneys received from judgments and settlements .
(c) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the department for  eligible mobilization
costs incurred by the department and reimbursements pursuant to ORS 476.560.
(2) As used in this section, “eligible  mobilization costs” means expenses incurred for emergency
mobilization and pre-positioning activities in Oregon.
SECTION 2. On or  before March 31 of each odd-numbered year, the Department of the
State Fire Marshal shall report to  the Joint Committee on Ways and Means, or to the in-
terim Joint Committee on Ways and Means, on:
(1) The amounts appropriated, allocated, deposited or transferred to the State  Fire Mar-
shal Mobilization Fund, from any source, on or after July 1  of the previous odd-numbered
year; and
(2) Actual and anticipated expenditures from the fund on  or after July 1 of the previous
odd-numbered year.
SECTION 3. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 861 (SB 861-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by Senate March 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 861 (SB 861-INTRO) Page 2